Hawaii statutes.
§657-21 Extension by keeping defendant in
ignorance. When an action is alleged by a plaintiff to have been commenced
within the time required by law, and the allegation is put in issue by the
defendant, it shall be competent for the defendant to prove, on the trial, that
the process issued by the plaintiff was not issued with the intent or in the
manner required by law; or that any means whatever were used by the plaintiff,
or the plaintiff's attorney, to prevent the service of the writ, or to keep the
defendant in ignorance of the issuing thereof. [CC 1859, §1044; RL 1925, §2655;
RL 1935, §3926; RL 1945, §10437; RL 1955, §241-20; HRS §657-21; am L 1972, c
105, §1(m); gen ch 1985]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next